Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.185

Escheat property—Records of department of revenue—Public record information.

All records of the department of revenue relating to escheated property or property about to escheat shall be a public record and shall be made available by the department of revenue for public inspection. Without limitation, the records to be made public shall include all available information regarding possible heirs, descriptions and amounts of property escheated or about to escheat, and any information which might serve to identify the proper heirs.

[ 1973 c 25 s 1.]